California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) When requested by resolution of the legislative body of any county, city and county, city, or district, the board shall permit any duly authorized officer or employee of the county, city and county, city, or district, or other person designated by that resolution, to examine all of the sales or transactions and use tax records
 of the board pertaining to the ascertainment of those sales or transactions and use taxes to be collected for the county, city and county, city, or district by the board pursuant to contract entered into between the board and the county, city and county, city, or district under the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)). Except as otherwise provided herein, this subdivision shall not be construed to allow any officer, employee, or other person authorized or designated by a county, city and county, city, or district to examine any sales or transactions and use tax records of any taxpayer. The costs that are incurred by the board in complying with a request made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deducted by the board from those revenues collected by the board on behalf of the county, city and county, city, or district making the request.

(1) The resolution shall certify that any person designated by the resolution, other than an officer or employee, meets all of the following conditions:

(A) Has an existing contract with the county, city and county, city, or district to examine those sales and use tax records.

(B) Is required by that contract to disclose information contained in, or derived from, those sales or transactions and use tax records only to an officer or employee of the county, city and county, city, or district who is authorized by the resolution to examine the information.

(C) Is prohibited by that contract from performing consulting services for a retailer during the term of that contract.

(D) Is prohibited by
 that contract from retaining the information contained in, or derived from, those sales or transactions and use tax records, after that contract has expired.

(2) Information obtained by examination of board records as permitted in this subdivision shall be used only for purposes related to the collection of local sales or transactions and use taxes by the board pursuant to the contract, or for purposes related to other governmental functions of the county, city and county, city, or district set forth in the resolution.

(c) If the board believes that any information obtained pursuant to subdivision (b) has been disclosed to any person not authorized or designated by the resolution of the legislative body of the county, city and county, city, or district, or has been used for purposes not permitted by subdivision (b), then notwithstanding subdivision (b), the board may impose
 conditions on access to its sales and use tax records which the board considers reasonable, in order to protect the confidentiality of those records.

(d) Predecessors, successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, and guarantors, if directly interested, may be given information as to the items included in the measure and amounts of any unpaid tax or amounts of tax required to be collected, interest, and penalties.

(e) For purposes of this section, “reciprocal agreement” means a formal agreement to exchange information between national taxing officials of Mexico and taxing authorities of the State Board of Equalization, the Franchise Tax Board, and the Employment Development Department. Furthermore, the reciprocal agreement shall be limited to the exchange of information which is essential for tax administration purposes only. Taxing authorities of the
 State of California shall be granted tax information only on California residents. Taxing authorities of Mexico shall be granted tax information only on Mexican nationals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 702, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7056.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by this article or other express provision of law, the information furnished or secured pursuant to this part shall be used solely for the purpose of administering the tax laws or other laws administered by the person or agency obtaining it. Any willful unauthorized inspection or unwarranted disclosure or use of the information by the person or agency, or the employees and officers thereof, is a misdemeanor. For purposes of this section, “inspection” means any examination of confidential information
 furnished or secured pursuant to this part.

(b) The board shall notify a taxpayer of any known incidents of willful unauthorized inspection or unwarranted disclosure or use of the taxpayer’s confidential tax records, but only if criminal charges have been filed for the willful unauthorized inspection or unwarranted disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7056.6.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person who is engaged in the business of preparing, or providing services in connection with the preparation of, returns under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451), or any person who for compensation prepares any such return for any other person, and who knowingly or recklessly does either of the following, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned no more than one year, or both, together with the
 costs of prosecution:

(1) Discloses any information furnished to him or her for, or in connection with, the preparation of the return.

(2) Uses that information for any purpose other than to prepare, or assist in preparing, the return.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to disclosure of information if that disclosure is made pursuant to the person’s consent or pursuant to a subpoena, court order, or other compulsory legal process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7057.

(a) The board may disclose to state governmental licensing entities identifying information of persons appearing on the list of the 500 largest tax delinquencies pursuant to Section 7063 for purposes of administering Section 494.5 of the Business and Professions Code. “Identifying information” means the name, social security number or taxpayer identification number, and the last known address of the persons appearing on the list of the 500 largest tax
 delinquencies.

(b) Neither the state governmental licensing entity, nor any officer, employee, or agent, or former officer, employee, or agent of a state governmental licensing entity, may disclose or use any information obtained from the board pursuant to this section, except to administer Section 494.5 of the Business and Professions Code or to inform the public of the denial, refusal to renew, or suspension of a license or the issuance of a temporary license pursuant to Section 494.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, state governmental licensing entity means a state governmental licensing entity as defined in Section 494.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 455, Sec. 8.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7057.5.

(a) The board may disclose to state agencies identifying information of persons appearing on the list of the 500 largest tax delinquencies pursuant to Section 7063 for purposes of administering Section 10295.4 of the Public Contract Code. “Identifying information” means the name, social security number or taxpayer identification number, and the last known address of the persons appearing on the list of the 500 largest tax delinquencies.

(b) A state agency, and any officer, employee, or agent, or former officer, employee, or agent of a state agency, shall not disclose or use any information obtained from the board, pursuant to this section, except to administer Section 10295.4 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 455, Sec. 9.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7058.

A certificate by the board or an employee of the board stating that a notice required by this part was given by mailing or personal service shall be prima facie evidence in any administrative or judicial proceeding of the fact and regularity of the mailing or personal service in accordance with any requirement of this part for the giving of a notice. Unless otherwise specifically required, any notice provided by this part to be mailed or served may be given either by mailing or by personal service in the manner provided for giving notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 610.)
-------------------------------------------

7060.

(a) The board, under regulations prescribed by the board, may establish a reward program for information resulting in the identification of underreported or unreported taxes due under this part. Any reward may not exceed 10 percent of the taxes collected as a result of the information provided. Any person employed by or under contract with any state or federal tax collection agency shall not be eligible for a reward provided pursuant to this section.

(b) Within
 212 years of the effective date of the act adding this subdivision or within 212 years of the commencement of a program pursuant to subdivision (a), whichever is later, the board shall report to the Legislature on all of the following:

(1) The number of informant letters and telephone calls received during the 2-year period following the effective date of the act adding this subdivision or following the commencement of a program pursuant to subdivision (a), whichever is later.

(2) The amount of additional taxes and penalties assessed and collected as a result of this program and the amount of rewards distributed.

(3) The administrative costs incurred in implementing and operating this program.

(c) Rewards paid pursuant to this section shall be paid from amounts appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 671, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Public Disclosure of Tax Delinquencies [7063. - 7063.]

7063.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall make available as a matter of public record each quarter a list of the 500 largest tax delinquencies in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) under this part. For purposes of compiling the list, a tax delinquency means an amount owed to the board which is all of the following:

(1) Based on a determination made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 6511) of Chapter 5 deemed final pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 6561) of Chapter 5, or that is “due and payable” under Article 4 (commencing with Section 6536) of Chapter 5, or self-assessed by the taxpayer.

(2) Recorded as a notice of state tax lien pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, in any county recorder’s office in this state.

(3) For an amount of tax delinquent for more than 90 days.

(b) For purposes of the list, a tax delinquency does not include any of the following and may not be included on the list:

(1) A delinquency that is under
 litigation in a court of law.

(2) A delinquency for which payment arrangements have been agreed to by both the taxpayer and the board and the taxpayer is in compliance with the arrangement.

(3) A delinquency for which the taxpayer has filed for bankruptcy protection pursuant to Title 11 of the United States Code.

(c) Each quarterly list shall, with respect to each delinquency, include all the following:

(1) The name of the person or persons liable for payment of the tax and that person’s or persons’ last known address.

(2) The amount of tax delinquency as shown on the notice or notices of state tax lien and any applicable interest or penalties, less any amounts paid.

(3) The earliest date that a notice of state tax lien was filed.

(4) The type of tax that is delinquent.

(d) Prior to making a tax delinquency a matter of public record as required by this section, the board shall provide a preliminary written notice to the person or persons liable for the tax by certified mail, return receipt requested. If within 30 days after issuance of the notice, the person or persons do not remit the amount due or make arrangements with the board for payment of the amount due, the tax delinquency shall be included on the list.

(e) The quarterly list described in subdivision (a) shall include the following:

(1) The telephone number and address of the board office to
 contact if a person believes placement of his or her name on the list is in error.

(2) The aggregate number of persons that have appeared on the list who have satisfied their delinquencies in their entirety and the dollar amounts, in the aggregate, that have been paid attributable to those delinquencies.

(f) As promptly as feasible, but no later than 5 business days from the occurrence of any of the following, the board shall remove that taxpayer’s name from the list of tax delinquencies:

(1) Tax delinquencies for which the person liable for the tax has contacted the board and resolution of the delinquency has been arranged.

(2) Tax delinquencies for which the board has verified that an active bankruptcy proceeding has been initiated.

(3) Tax delinquencies for which the board has verified that a bankruptcy proceeding has been completed and there are no assets available with which to pay the delinquent amount or amounts.

(4) Tax delinquencies that the board has determined to be uncollectible.

(g) A person whose delinquency appears on the quarterly list, and who satisfies that delinquency in whole or in part, may request the board to include in its quarterly list any payments that person made to satisfy the delinquency. Upon receipt of that request, the board shall include those payments on the list as promptly as feasible.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person whose delinquency appeared on the quarterly list and whose name has been removed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (f) shall comply with the terms of the arranged resolution. If a person fails to do so, the board shall add that person’s name to the list of delinquencies without providing the prior written notice required by subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 455, Sec. 10.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Tax Amnesty Program [7070. - 7078.]

7070.

The board shall develop and administer a tax amnesty program for taxpayers subject to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), as provided in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7071.

The tax amnesty program shall be conducted for a two month period beginning February 1, 2005 through March 31, 2005, inclusive, or during a timeframe ending no later than June 30, 2005. The program shall apply to tax liabilities due and payable for tax reporting periods beginning before January 1, 2003.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7072.

(a) For any taxpayer who meets the requirements of Section 7073:

(1) The board shall waive all penalties imposed by this part, for the tax reporting periods for which tax amnesty is allowed for the nonreporting or underreporting of tax liabilities or the nonpayment of any taxes previously determined or proposed to be determined.

(2) Except
 as provided in subdivision (b), no criminal action shall be brought against the taxpayer, for the tax reporting periods for which tax amnesty is requested, for the nonreporting or underreporting of tax liabilities.

(b) This section does not apply to violations of this part for which, as of the first day of the amnesty period specified in Section 7071, (1) the taxpayer is on notice of a criminal investigation by a complaint having been filed against him or her or by written notice having been mailed to him or her that he or she is under criminal investigation, or (2) a court proceeding has already been initiated.

(c) No refund or credit shall be granted of any penalty paid prior to the time the taxpayer makes a request for tax amnesty pursuant to Section 7073.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7073.

(a) This article shall apply to any taxpayer who, during the amnesty period specified in Section 7071, meets all of the following:

(1) Is eligible to participate in the tax amnesty program.

(2) Files a completed amnesty application with the board, signed under penalty of perjury, to participate in the tax amnesty program.

(3) Within 60 days after the conclusion of the tax amnesty period, does all of the following:

(A) Files completed tax returns for all tax reporting periods for which he or she has not previously filed a tax return and files completed amended returns for all tax reporting periods for which he or she underreported his or her tax liability.

(B) Pays in full the taxes and interest due for all periods for which amnesty is requested, or applies for an installment agreement under subdivision (b).

(C) For taxpayers who have not paid in full any tax liabilities due and payable for tax reporting periods beginning before January 1, 2003, pays in full the taxes and interest due for each period for that portion of the proposed determination for each period for which
 amnesty is requested or applies for an installment payment agreement under subdivision (b).

(4) In the case of any taxpayer that has filed for bankruptcy protection under Title 11 of the United States Code, submits an order from a Federal Bankruptcy Court allowing the taxpayer to participate in the amnesty program.

(b) The board may enter into an installment payment agreement in lieu of the complete payment required under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), but only if final payment under the terms of that installment payment agreement is due and is paid no later than June 30, 2006. The installment payment agreement shall include interest on the outstanding amount due at the rate prescribed by law. Failure by the taxpayer to fully comply with the terms of the installment payment agreement shall render the waiver of penalties null and void, unless the board
 determines that the failure was due to reasonable causes, and the total amount of tax, interest, and all penalties shall be immediately due and payable.

(c) If, subsequent to the amnesty period specified in Section 7071, the board issues a deficiency determination upon a return filed pursuant to subdivision (a), or upon any other nonreporting or underreporting of tax liability by any person who could have otherwise been eligible for amnesty, the board shall impose penalties at a rate that is double the rate of penalties described in law and criminal action may be brought under this part only with respect to the difference between the amount shown on that return and the correct amount of tax, or the amount of unreported or underreported tax, whichever the case may be. This action may not invalidate any waivers granted under Section 7072.

(d) If the board issues a deficiency
 determination under conditions described in subdivision (c), the board may issue that deficiency determination within 10 years from the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the amount is proposed to be determined.

(e) The application required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be in the form and manner specified by the board, but in no case shall a mere payment of any taxes and interest due, in whole or in part, for any period otherwise eligible for amnesty under this part, be deemed to constitute an acceptable amnesty application under this part. For purposes of the preceding sentence, the application of a refund from one period to offset a tax liability for another period otherwise eligible for amnesty shall not be allowed without the filing of an amnesty application under this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7074.

(a) Except for taxpayers who have entered into an installment payment agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7073, there shall be added to the tax for each period for which amnesty could have been requested:

(1) For amounts that are due and payable on the last date of the amnesty period, an amount equal to 50 percent of the accrued interest payable under Section 6591 for the period beginning
 on the date in which the tax was due and ending on the last day of the amnesty period specified in Section 7071.

(2) An amount equal to 50 percent of the interest computed under Section 6591 on any final amount, including final deficiencies and self-assessed amounts, for the period beginning on the date in which the tax was due and ending on the last day of the amnesty period specified in Section 7071.

(b) The penalty imposed by this section is in addition to any other penalty imposed under this part.

(c) Article 2 (commencing with Section 6481) does not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 398, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7075.

Any taxpayer who has an existing installment payment agreement under Section 6832 as of the start of the amnesty program, and who does not participate in the amnesty program, may not be subject to the penalty imposed under Section 7074.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.

The board shall issue forms and instructions and take other actions needed to implement this article. The provisions contained in subdivision (c) of Section 19735, to the extent feasible and practical, shall also apply to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   Effective August 16, 2004.   See same-numbered section within Article 2.5, as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 87.)
-------------------------------------------

7077.

The board shall adequately publicize the tax penalty amnesty program so as to maximize public awareness of the participation in the program. The board shall coordinate to the highest degree possible its publicity efforts and other actions taken in implementing this article with similar programs administered by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7078.

Subdivision (b) of Section 19736, to the extent feasible and practical, shall also apply to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Managed Audit Program [7076. - 7076.4.]

7076.

(a) The State Board of Equalization shall determine which taxpayer’s accounts are eligible for the managed audit program in a manner that is consistent with the efficient use of its auditing resources and the maximum effectiveness of the program.

(b) A taxpayer is not required to participate in the managed audit program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.   See same-numbered section within Article 2, as added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.1.

A taxpayer’s account is eligible for the managed audit program only if the taxpayer meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The taxpayer’s business involves few or no statutory exemptions.

(b) The taxpayer’s business involves a single or small number of clearly defined taxability issues.

(c) The taxpayer is taxed pursuant to this part and agrees to participate in the managed audit program.

(d) The taxpayer has the resources to comply with the managed audit instructions provided by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.2.

(a) If the board selects a taxpayer’s account for a managed audit, all of the following apply:

(1) The board shall identify all of the following:

(A) The audit period covered by the managed audit.

(B) The types of transactions covered by the managed audit.

(C) The specific procedures that the taxpayer is to follow in determining any liability.

(D) The records to be reviewed by the taxpayer.

(E) The manner in which the types of transactions are to be scheduled for review.

(F) The time period for completion of the managed audit.

(G) The time period for the payment of the liability and interest.

(H) Any other criteria that the board may require for completion of the managed audit.

(2) The taxpayer shall:

(A) Examine its books, records, and equipment to determine if it has any unreported tax liability for the audit period.

(B) Make available to the board for verification all computations, books, records, and equipment examined pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(b) The information provided by the taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is the same information that is required for the completion of any other audit that the board may conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.3.

Nothing in this article limits the board’s authority to examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of a taxpayer under Section 7054.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7076.4.

Upon completion of the managed audit and verification by the board, interest on any unpaid liability shall be computed at one-half the rate that would otherwise be imposed for liabilities covered by the audit period. Payment of the liabilities and interest shall be made within the time period
 specified by the board. If the requirements for the managed audit are not satisfied, the board may proceed to examine the records of the taxpayer in a manner to be determined by the board under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [7080. - 7099.1.]

7080.

This article shall be known and may be cited as “The Harris-Katz California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7081.

The Legislature finds and declares that taxes are the most sensitive point of contact between citizens and their government, and that there is a delicate balance between revenue collection and freedom from government oppression. It is the intent of the Legislature to place guarantees in California law to ensure that the rights, privacy, and property of California taxpayers are adequately protected during the process of the assessment and collection of taxes.

The Legislature further finds that the California tax system
 is based largely on voluntary compliance, and the development of understandable tax laws and taxpayers informed of those laws will improve both voluntary compliance and the relationship between taxpayers and government. It is the further intent of the Legislature to promote improved voluntary taxpayer compliance by improving the clarity of tax laws and efforts to inform the public of the proper application of those laws.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the purpose of any tax proceeding between the State Board of Equalization and a taxpayer is the determination of the taxpayer’s correct amount of tax liability. It is the intent of the Legislature that, in furtherance of this purpose, the State Board of Equalization may inquire into, and shall allow the taxpayer every opportunity to present, all relevant information pertaining to the taxpayer’s liability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7082.

The board shall administer this article. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this article shall apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7083.

(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of taxpayer complaints and problems, including any taxpayer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of taxpayers by board employees, and staying actions where taxpayers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest which would otherwise accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7084.

(a) The board shall develop and implement a taxpayer education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Taxpayers newly registered with the board.

(2) Taxpayer or industry groups identified in the annual report described in Section 7085.

(3) Board audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) Mailings to, or appropriate and effective contact with, the taxpayer groups specified in subdivision (a) which explain in simplified terms the most common areas of noncompliance the taxpayers or industry groups are likely to encounter.

(2) A program of written communication with newly registered taxpayers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities as a holder of a seller’s permit or use tax registrant and the most common areas of noncompliance encountered by participants in their business or industry.

(3) Participation in small business seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(4) Revision of taxpayer educational materials currently produced by the board which explain the most common areas of taxpayer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(5) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to taxpayer activities and areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance or inconsistency of administration.

(c) Electronic media used pursuant to this section shall not represent the voice, picture, or name of members of the board or of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 612, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7085.

(a) The board shall perform annually a systematic identification of areas of recurrent taxpayer noncompliance and shall report its findings in its annual report submitted pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code.

(b) As part of the identification process described in subdivision (a), the board shall do both of the following:

(1) Compile and analyze sample data from its audit process, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The statute or regulation violated by the taxpayer.

(B) The amount of tax involved.

(C) The industry or business engaged in by the taxpayer.

(D) The number of years covered in the audit period.

(E) Whether or not professional tax preparation assistance was utilized by the taxpayer.

(F) Whether sales and use tax returns were filed by the taxpayer.

(2) Conduct an annual hearing before the full board where industry representatives and individual taxpayers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Sales and Use Tax Law which may further facilitate achievement of the legislative findings.

(c) The board shall include in its report recommendations for improving taxpayer compliance and uniform administration, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Changes in statute or board regulations.

(2) Improvement of training of board personnel.

(3) Improvement of taxpayer communication and education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7086.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language which explain procedures, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and taxpayers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to taxpayers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional taxes, any subsequent notice of tax due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include the statement in the annual tax information bulletins which are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7087.

(a) The total amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following: 

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees. 

(2) To impose or suggest revenue quotas or goals, other than quotas or goals with respect to accounts receivable. 

(b) The board shall certify in its annual report submitted pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that revenue collected or assessed is not used
 in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a). 

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the setting of goals and the evaluation of performance with respect to productivity and the efficient use of time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 402, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7088.

(a) The board shall develop and implement a program which will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to his or her contact with taxpayers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(b) The board shall report to the Legislature on the implementation of this program in its annual report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7089.

No later than July 1, 1989, the board shall, in cooperation with the State Bar of California, the California Society of Certified Public Accountants, the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include determination of standard time frames and special review of cases which take more time than the appropriate standard time frame.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7090.

Procedures of the board, relating to protest hearings before board hearing officers, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any hearing shall be held at a reasonable time at a board office which is convenient to the taxpayer.

(b) The hearing may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the taxpayer and the taxpayer is entitled to receive a copy of the recording.

(c) The taxpayer shall be informed prior to any hearing that he or she has a right to have
 present at the hearing his or her attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7091.

(a) Every taxpayer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The taxpayer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the taxpayer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refund.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other issues, the amount
 of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those which relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to this section shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7092.

(a) An officer or employee of the board acting in connection with any law administered by the board shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful
 investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information where the person is being investigated for multiple violations which include sales and use tax violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of informants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1574, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7093.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to civil tax matters in dispute that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the director for approval unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the